District of Columbia statutes.
7-875.03

Establishment of uniform health screening requirements and health assessment enrollment forms.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish uniform, age-appropriate health screening requirements consistent with the standards and schedules of the American Academy of Pediatrics for all children, from birth to 21 years of age, in the District of Columbia, regardless of insurance status who are:

(1)

Residents of the District;

(2)

Wards of the District; or

(3)

Children with special needs who reside in or who are receiving services in another state.

(b)

The Mayor shall develop a uniform health assessment form for enrollment of children in child-related health, human or social services, and educational programs. Use of the form is not intended to supersede the enrollment requirements of child-related health, educational, and human or social services programs. The form may be supplemented by additional forms used for enrollment that are not related to health assessment.

(c)

Uniform health screenings shall not be required under this chapter, if a minor’s parent or guardian or an adult youth submits in good faith a written notarized statement to the appropriate official affirming that the screening in question would violate the established tenets and practices of the parent’s or guardian’s church or religious denomination, or in the case of an adult youth, the adult youth’s church or religious denomination.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 304, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 304 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 304 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 304 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 304 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 304 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).